Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1648YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 350 Section 1. Section 904.310A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Funds appropriated to the department or other funds made 3 available to the department shall not be used to distribute 4 or make available any commercially published information or 5 material to an inmate committed to any institution, as provided 6 in section 904.102, under the control of the department when 7 such information or material is sexually explicit or features 8 nudity including but not limited to showing the following: 9 a. Penetration of the penis into the vagina or anus . 10 b. Contact between the mouth and genitalia or mouth and 11 anus or contact between the genitalia of one person and the 12 genitalia or anus of another person. 13 c. Contact between the finger, hand, or other body part of 14 one person and the genitalia or anus of another person. 15 d. Ejaculation onto the person of another. 16 e. Use of artificial sexual organs or substitutes therefor 17 in contact with the genitalia or anus. 18